Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 4

Peer Review

63-10-401. Statement of policy.

It is the policy of the state to encourage committees made up of Tennessee's licensed pharmacists to candidly, conscientiously and objectively evaluate their peers' professional conduct, competence and ability to practice pharmacy and their personal conduct as it relates to the performance of their professional duties. It is further the policy of the state to encourage pharmacists to implement continuous quality improvement programs and quality assurance programs to identify and evaluate quality-related events, reduce medication-related errors, generate data useful to studying the causes of medication errors and improve patient care. The state further recognizes that confidentiality is essential to effective functioning of peer review committees, continuous quality improvement programs and quality assurance programs and to continued improvement in patient safety and patient care.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 22; T.C.A. § 63-10-601; Acts 2006, ch. 768, § 2.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-402. Immunity for furnishing information to peer review committees.

All national, state or local public or private organizations, institutions, foundations, systems, provider networks or professional associations or societies, pharmacists, auxiliary pharmacy personnel, pharmacy committee staff personnel, any person under a contract or other formal agreement with a peer review committee and any person who participates with or assists a peer review committee, members of boards of directors or trustees of any public or private hospital, managed care organization or other health care provider or any individual appointed to any peer review committee is immune from liability to any patient, individual or organization for furnishing information, data, reports or records to any such committee or for damages resulting from any decision, opinions, actions and proceedings rendered, entered or acted upon by such committees, if made or taken in good faith without malice and on the basis of facts reasonably known or reasonably believed to exist.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 22; T.C.A. § 63-10-602.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-403. Immunity for reports regarding competence or professional conduct of pharmacist or personnel.

Notwithstanding § 63-10-402, any person providing information, whether as a witness or otherwise, to a peer review committee regarding the competence or professional conduct of a pharmacist or pharmacy auxiliary personnel is immune from liability to any person, unless such information is false and the person providing it had actual knowledge of its falsity.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 22; T.C.A. § 63-10-603.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-404. Presumption of good faith.

A member of a peer review committee or any other person reporting information to a peer review committee is presumed to have acted in good faith and without malice. Any person alleging lack of good faith has the burden of proving bad faith and malice.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 22; T.C.A. § 63-10-604.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-405. Information provided to committees privileged.

All information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda or other data furnished to any peer review committee, association board, organization board or other entity and any findings, conclusions or recommendations resulting from the proceedings of such committee, board or entity are privileged. The records and proceedings of any peer review committee, board or entity are confidential and shall be used by such committee, board or entity, and the members thereof, only in the exercise of the proper functions of the committee, board or entity and shall not be public records nor be available for court subpoena or for discovery proceedings. One (1) proper function of a peer review committee includes advocacy for pharmacists and pharmacy auxiliary personnel before other peer review committees, health care organizations, insurance companies, national, state or local accreditation organizations, federal and state agencies and the board of pharmacy of this state or any other state. The disclosure of confidential, privileged peer review committee information during advocacy, or as a report to the board of pharmacy, or to the affected pharmacist or pharmacy auxiliary personnel under review does not constitute either a waiver of confidentiality or privilege. Nothing contained in this subsection (a) applies to records, documents or information otherwise available from original sources and such records, documents or information are not to be construed as immune from discovery or use in any civil proceedings solely due to presentation to the committee.

All information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda or other documents and materials created in the course of operation of a pharmacy continuous quality improvement program or quality assurance program shall be privileged and confidential and shall not be subject to discovery or subpoena or other means of legal process or introduction into evidence in any civil action, arbitration, administrative proceeding or state board of pharmacy proceeding. The pharmacy shall hold the privilege to all information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda or other documents and materials created in the course of the pharmacy's continuous quality improvement program or quality assurance program. The privilege may be waived by the pharmacy. Nothing in this subsection (b) shall affect the discoverability of any records not solely generated for or maintained as a component of a pharmacy's ongoing continuous quality improvement program and quality assurance program.

Nothing in subsection (b) shall be construed to prohibit a pharmacy from compiling, disclosing, reporting or otherwise using information or data that may be generated from the privileged and confidential documents and materials described in subsection (b), where the compiling, disclosing, reporting or otherwise using of the information or data is for the purpose of conducting research, providing education, reporting to federal or state patient safety or quality improvement databases, developing best practice guidelines or for similar other purposes, if personal information is redacted prior to disclosure.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 22; T.C.A. § 63-10-605; Acts 2006, ch. 768, § 3.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-406. Part not applicable to review of physician's conduct.

In no event, however, shall the protections provided in this part apply to any type of review by a peer review committee or pharmacist review committee, as defined in this chapter, related to any acts, conduct or professional services rendered by physicians under chapter 6 or 9 of this title. A peer review committee or pharmacist review committee may convey information to licensed physicians or physician licensing boards.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 22; T.C.A. § 63-10-606.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.